Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.220

Tax on vehicle parking charges.

(1) A public facility district may levy and fix a tax on any vehicle parking charges imposed at any parking facility that is owned or leased by the public facility district as part of a regional center, as defined in RCW 35.57.020, or a baseball stadium, as defined in RCW 82.14.0485. No county, city, or town within which the regional center or baseball stadium is located may impose a tax of the same or similar kind on any vehicle parking charges at the facility.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "vehicle parking charges" means only the actual parking charges exclusive of taxes and service charges and the value of any other benefit conferred.

(3) The tax authorized under this section must be at the rate of not more than ten percent. The tax authorized by this section with respect to a parking facility associated with a baseball stadium must be used exclusively to fund repair, reequipping, and capital improvement of the baseball stadium, and is not subject to the requirements of RCW 36.100.010(4).

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 38 s 3; 1999 c 165 s 18.]